Hawaii statutes.
§461-4.5 Powers and duties. (a) In
addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the board:

(1) Shall adopt, amend, and repeal rules pursuant to
chapter 91, as it deems proper for the purposes of this chapter, Public Law
100-293, and 21 Code of Federal Regulations part 205;

(2) Shall examine, license, reinstate, and renew the
licenses of qualified applicants for registered pharmacists and wholesale
prescription drug distributors, and issue and renew permits to operate
pharmacies;

(3) May require the inspection of any wholesale
prescription drug distributor premises in the State to ensure compliance with
this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter, or may require an applicant
for a pharmacy license to submit a statement that the premises, including but
not limited to security and sanitation, are in conformance with the board's
requirements and that the applicant possesses the reference materials and
technical clinical equipment and supplies as may be specified in rules adopted
under this chapter;

(4) May fine, suspend, or revoke any license or
permit for any cause prescribed by this chapter, or for any violation of the
rules adopted under this chapter, and refuse to grant or renew any license or
permit for any cause which would be ground for revocation or suspension of a
license or permit; and

(5) May deny a license to any applicant who has been
disciplined by another state or federal agency. Notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, a final order of disciplinary action taken pursuant to this paragraph
shall be a matter of public record.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall modify or
limit any powers of the board or the department of health of this State. [L
1986, c 143, §1; am L 1992, c 196, §4 and c 202, §137; am L 1997, c 38, §4; am L
2016, c 38, §9]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next